Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2437
Board; elect officers; executive director; employees.

The directors shall elect a chairperson and vice-chairperson of the board from among the directors. The agency shall have power to employ an executive director. The directors shall elect a secretary who shall either be from among the directors or the executive director. The agency may employ legal counsel for such legal services as it may require. The agency may also employ technical experts and such other officers, agents, and employees as it may require and shall determine their qualifications, duties, compensation, and term of office. The board may delegate to one or more of the agency's employees or agents such powers and duties as the board may deem proper.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 37.